test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-aigi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - äigi: # i-stems
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom: äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill: ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc: ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com: aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe: äˊigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess: äigin
    äigi+N+Par: äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom: ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen: aaigij
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc: aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill: aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc: aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com: aˊigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe: aˊigijttáá
